Utah statutes.
11-13-208.   Agreement does not relieve public agency of legal obligation or responsibility -- Exception.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an agreement made under this chapter does not relieve a public agency of an obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law.

(2)  If an obligation or responsibility of a public agency is actually and timely performed by a joint board or by an interlocal entity created by an agreement made under this chapter, that performance may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

